Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 4
TEMPORARY EDUCATOR LOAN
FORGIVENESS PROGRAM

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1220, see section 1 of chapter 239, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-3.9-401. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Approved program of preparation" means a program of study for preparation that is approved by the Colorado commission on higher education pursuant to section 23-1-121, including a preparation program for school counselors or an alternative teacher program, as defined in section 22-60.5-102 (5), and that upon completion leads to a recommendation for licensure by an accepted institution of higher education, as defined in section 22-60.5-102 (1).

"At-risk pupils" has the same meaning as set forth in section 22-54-103 (1.5)(a)(VI).

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education.

"Educator" means a teacher or school counselor.

"Facility school" means an approved facility school, as defined in section 22-2-402 (1).

"Qualified loan" means an educational loan incurred while completing a program of preparation, including an alternative teacher preparation program approved pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22, that leads to educator licensure pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22, or a bachelor's or master's degree in the area in which the educator is employed in a qualified position.

"Qualified position" means:

A hard-to-staff educator position in a rural school or rural school district, or in a facility school that is in a rural school district, identified by the department of education pursuant to section 23-3.9-102 (6); or

A hard-to-staff educator position in a content shortage area identified pursuant to section 23-3.9-102 (6) in a Colorado public school, a school operated by a board of cooperative services created pursuant to article 5 of title 22, or a facility school.

"Rural school" or "rural school district" means a public school or school district identified by the department of education pursuant to section 23-3.9-102 (6).

"School" or "public school" means a public school that serves any of grades kindergarten through twelve and that derives its support, in whole or in part, from money raised by a general state or school district tax. A public school includes a charter school authorized by a school district pursuant to part 1 of article 30.5 of title 22, by the state charter school institute pursuant to part 5 of article 30.5 of title 22, or by the Colorado school for the deaf and the blind pursuant to section 22-80-102 (4).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1220), ch. 239, p. 1773, § 3, effective May 26.

23-3.9-402. Temporary educator loan forgiveness program - administration - eligibility.

The general assembly authorizes the commission to develop and maintain a temporary educator loan forgiveness program for implementation in the 2022-23 state fiscal year for payment of all or part of the principal and interest of the qualified loans of an educator who is hired for a qualified position. The commission shall determine whether a loan is a qualified loan for purposes of the temporary educator loan forgiveness program. The commission shall develop loan repayment policies that ensure the money is used for the repayment of qualified loans of educators employed in qualified positions.

The general assembly shall appropriate to the commission ten million dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund created pursuant to section 24-75-228 to fund the temporary educator loan forgiveness program. The commission or a loan forgiveness recipient shall spend or obligate any money received pursuant to this section by December 30, 2024. Any money obligated by December 31, 2024, must be expended by December 31, 2026.

No later than July 1, 2022, the commission shall approve applications. If more new participants apply than can be approved based on the money available, the commission shall:

First, approve applicants who have contracted for a qualified position in a rural school district or rural school whose percentage of at-risk pupils exceeded sixty percent in the 2021-22 budget year;

Second, approve applicants who have contracted for a qualified position in a content shortage area with a school whose percentage of at-risk pupils exceeded sixty percent in the 2021-22 budget year;

Third, approve applicants who have contracted for a qualified position in a rural school district or rural school; and

Fourth, approve applicants who have contracted with a school for a qualified position in a content shortage area.

In addition to any qualifications the commission specifies, to qualify for the temporary educator loan forgiveness program, an educator must:

Graduate from a program of preparation that leads to educator licensure pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22;

Meet licensure requirements pursuant to section 22-60.5-201 (1)(a) or (1)(b) or 22-60.5-210 (1)(a);

Enter the educator workforce on or after the 2019-20 state fiscal year and contract for a qualified position no later than the end of the 2021-22 state fiscal year; and

Be liable for an outstanding balance on a qualified loan.

An educator who has received money from the educator loan forgiveness program created in section 23-3.9-102, student educator stipend program created in section 23-3.9-302, or educator test stipend program created in section 23-3.9-303 is not eligible for loan forgiveness money pursuant to this part 4.

An educator who qualifies pursuant to subsection (2) of this section is eligible for up to five thousand dollars in loan forgiveness.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1220), ch. 239, p. 1774, § 3, effective May 26.

23-3.9-403. Reporting.

The commission, and any person who receives money from the commission, including each loan forgiveness recipient, shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1220), ch. 239, p. 1775, § 3, effective May 26.

23-3.9-404. Repeal of part.

This part 4 is repealed, effective January 31, 2027.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1220), ch. 239, p. 1776, § 3, effective May 26.